New Jersey, session 221, S2398.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Each proprietary degree-granting institution shall disclose its status as a for-profit business in a prominent place on: the institutions official website; contracts for instruction; catalogs; and all promotional digital and print media created on or after the effective date of this act.  The disclosure shall be made in a type size as large or larger than any other text on the website, page, or document, except for the type size of the name of the institution.  The disclosure shall be presented in a manner reasonably calculated to draw the attention of the reader. 2. a. Each institution of higher education and proprietary degree-granting institution shall disclose its accreditation status on the institutions official website, contracts for instruction, catalog, and all promotional digital and print media created on or after the effective date of this act.  The disclosure shall be made in a type size as large or larger than any other text on the institutions official website, contracts for instruction, catalog, and promotional digital and print media, except for the type size of the name of the institution.  The disclosure shall be presented in a manner reasonably calculated to draw the attention of the reader. b. In the event that the institutions official website, contracts for instruction, catalog, or promotional digital or print media created on or after the effective date of this act includes content pertaining to the institutions accreditation with an agency not recognized by the United States Department of Education, the disclosure required pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be restated on each page in which a reference to accreditation appears. c. As used in this section, accreditation status means whether the institution has received the appropriate accreditation from an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education. 3. This act shall take effect on the 90th day after the date of enactment.